Idaho, session 2026, H0855.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-413, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-413. LIFETIME LICENSE CERTIFICATE -- FEE. (a) The fish and game
commission shall issue rules and regulations to administer a lifetime li-
cense certificate system.
(b) A lifetime license certificate may be sold to any person who quali-
fies as a resident or is granted resident license privileges as provided in
subsection (s) of section 36-202, Idaho Code, if such person has been a resi-
dent of this state for at least five (5) years immediately preceding the date
of application for the lifetime license certificate. If the applicant is un-
der the age of five (5) years, a legal guardian of the child shall have been a
resident of this state for at least five (5) years immediately preceding the
date of application.
(c) A lifetime certificate may be obtained by a person one (1) day of age
through one (1) year of age possessing the qualifications therein described
upon payment of: twenty-five (25) times the fee prescribed for a combined
hunting and fishing license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a combined
hunting and fishing license certificate; twenty-five (25) times the fee pre-
scribed for a hunting license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a hunting
license certificate; twenty-five (25) times the fee prescribed for a fishing
license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a fishing license certificate;
or twenty-five (25) times the fee prescribed for a trapping license in sec-
tion 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a trapping license certificate.
(d) A lifetime certificate may be obtained by a person two (2) years of
age through fifty (50) years of age possessing the qualifications therein
described upon payment of: thirty-five (35) times the fee prescribed for a
combined hunting and fishing license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for
a combined hunting and fishing license certificate; thirty-five (35) times
the fee prescribed for a hunting license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code,
for a hunting license certificate; thirty-five (35) times the fee prescribed
for a fishing license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a fishing license
certificate; or thirty-five (35) times the fee prescribed for a trapping li-
cense in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a trapping license certificate.
(e) A lifetime certificate may be obtained by a person fifty-one (51)
years of age or older possessing the qualifications therein described upon
payment of: twenty (20) times the fee prescribed for a combined hunting and
fishing license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a combined hunting


and fishing license certificate; twenty (20) times the fee prescribed for
a hunting license in section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a hunting license
certificate; twenty (20) times the fee prescribed for a fishing license in
section 36-416(a), Idaho Code, for a fishing license certificate; or twenty
(20) times the fee prescribed for a trapping license in section 36-416(a),
Idaho Code, for a trapping license certificate.
(f) Holders of lifetime license certificates shall be subject to the
provisions of title 36, Idaho Code.
(g) The director shall promptly transmit to the state treasurer all
moneys received by him from the sale of lifetime license certificates and
the state treasurer shall deposit all such moneys in the fish and game trust
fund. All such moneys shall be expended at the direction of the commission
to carry out the purposes of the Idaho fish and game code or any law or regu-
lation promulgated for the protection of wildlife, and shall be used for no
other purpose.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.